District of Columbia statutes.
31-1323

Collection and list of assets.

(a)

As soon as practicable after the liquidation order, but not later than 120 days thereafter, the liquidator shall prepare in duplicate a list of the insurer’s assets. The list shall be amended or supplemented from time to time as the liquidator may determine. One copy shall be filed in the office of the Clerk of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, and 1 copy shall be retained for the liquidator’s files. All amendments and supplements shall be similarly filed.

(b)

The liquidator shall reduce the assets to a degree of liquidity that is consistent with the effective execution of the liquidation.

(c)

A submission to the court for disbursement of assets in accordance with § 31-1332 fulfills the requirements of subsection (a) of this section.

History

Oct. 15, 1993, D.C. Law 10-35, § 24, 40 DCR 5773

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-2823.